Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3002
Financial literacy, defined.

For purposes of the Financial Literacy Act, financial literacy includes, but is not limited to, knowledge and skills regarding budget and financial record keeping; banking; taxes; establishing, building, maintaining, and monitoring credit; debt; savings; risk management; insurance; and investment strategies.

Laws 2021, LB452, § 2.